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DTC P2 120/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”D”
Circuit

DTC P2 122/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”D”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P2 123/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”D”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2 125/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”E”
Circuit

DTC P2 127/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”E”
Circuit Low Input

DTC P2 128/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch”E”
Circuit High Input

DTC P2 138/19Throttle/PedalPositionSensor/Switch
”D”/”E” Voltage Correlation

HINT:
This is the repair procedure for the ”accelerator pedal position sensor”.
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CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
A vehicle that is equipped with an Electronic Throttle Control System (ETCS) does not have a throttle cable.
The APP sensor is mounted on the accelerator pedal bracket. The APP sensor has 2 sensor elements/signal
outputs:VPA 1 andVPA2.VPA 1 isused todetect theactualacceleratorpedalangle (used forenginecontrol)
andVPA2 isused todetectmalfunctions inVPA 1.Voltageapplied toVPA 1 andVPA2changesbetween0.2
V and 5 V in proportion to the accelerator pedal angle.
TheenginecontrolECUmonitors theacceleratorpedalangle fromVPA 1 andVPA2signaloutputs,andcon-
trols the throttle actuator based on these signals.

DTC No.
DTC Detection Condition

(Open or short in accelerator pedal position sensor circuit)
Main trouble Area

P2120/19
Condition (a) continues for 0.5 seconds or more:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)VPA 0.2VandVPA2 0.97deg,orVPA 4.8V

SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P2122/19

Condition (a)and (b)continues for0.5secondsormore:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)VPA 0.2V
(b)VPA2 0.97deg

SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SVCPAcircuitopen
SVPAcircuitopenorgroundshort
SEnginecontrolECU

P2123/19
Condition (a) continues for 2.0 seconds or more:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)VPA 4.8V

SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEPAcircuitopen
SEnginecontrolECU

P2125/19

Condition (a) continues for 0.5 seconds or more:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)VPA2 0.5VandVPA 0.97deg,orVPA2 4.8Vand

0.2V VPA 3.45V

SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P2127/19

Condition (a)and (b)continues for0.5secondsormore:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)VPA2 0.5V
(b)VPA 0.97deg

SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SVCP2circuitopen
SVPA2circuitopenorgroundshort
SEnginecontrolECU
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P2128/19

Condition (a) and (b) continues for 2.0 seconds or more:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a)VPA2 4.8V
(a)0.2V VPA 3.45V

SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEPAcircuitopen
SEnginecontrolECU

P2138/19

Condition (a) or (b) continues for 2.0 seconds or more:
(1 tripdetection logic)
(a) |VPA − VPA2| 0.02V
(b)VPA 0.2VandVPA2 0.5V

SVPAandVPA2circuitareshort circuited
SAcceleratorpedalpositionsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTCP2 120,P2 122,P2 123,P2 125,P2 127,P2 128andP2 138use thehand −held tester
to confirm the accelerator pedal opening percentage.

Accelerator pedal position expressed as voltage

Troublearea Accelerator pedal completely released Accelerator pedal fully depressedT rouble area

ACCELPOS# 1 ACCELPOS#2 ACCELPOS# 1 ACCELPOS#2

VC circuit open 0 to 0.2 V 0 to 0.2 V 0 to 0.2 V 0 to 0.2 V

VPA circuit open or ground short 0 to 0.2 V 1.2 to2.0V 0 to 0.2 V 3.4 to 5.3 V

VPA2 circuit open or ground short 0.5 to 1.1 V 0 to 0.2 V 2.6 to 4.5 V 0 to 0.2 V

E2 circuit open 4.5 to 5.5 V 4.5 to 5.5 V 4.5 to 5.5 V 4.5 to 5.5 V

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
When VPA or VPA2, deviates from the standard, or the difference between the voltage outputs of the two
sensors is less than threshold, the engine control ECU concludes that there is a defect in the accelerator
pedal position sensor. The engine control ECU turns on the MIL and a DTC is set.
Example:
When the voltage output of the VPA below 0.2 V or exceeds 4.8 V.
The monitor runs for 2 seconds (the first 2 seconds for engine idle) after the engine is started.

FAIL SAFE
The accelerator pedal position sensor has two (main and sub) sensor circuits. If a malfunction occurs in ei-
ther of the sensor circuits, the engine control ECU detects the abnormal signal voltage difference between
the two sensor circuits and switches to limp mode. In limp mode, the remaining circuit is used to calculate
the accelerator pedal opening to allow the vehicle to continue driving.
If both circuits malfunction, the engine control ECU regards the opening angle of the accelerator pedal to
be fully closed.
In this case, the throttle valve will remain closed as if the engine is idling.
If a ”pass”condition isdetectedand then the ignitionswitch is turnedOFF, the fail −safeoperationwill stop
and the system will return to normal condition.
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditionswhen
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
runningorstopped, if theenginewaswarmedupornot, if theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,aswell asother
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Connecthand −held tester,andreadthevoltageforacceleratorpedalposition
sensor data.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchONandpush thehand −held tes-

ter main switch ON.
(c) Enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD /

DATALIST /ETCS/ACCELPOS# 1 andACCELPOS#2.
CHECK:
Read thevoltage for theacceleratorpedalpositionsensordata.
OK:

Accelerator pedal ACCELPOS# 1 ACCEL POS #2

Released 0.5 to 1.1 V 1.2 to2.0V

Depressed 2.6 to 4.5 V 3.4 to 5.3 V

OK Go to step 5.

NG
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2 Check accelerator pedal position sensor.

(a) Disconnect the accelerator pedal position sensor con-
nector.

CHECK:
(a) Measure the resistance between each terminal.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

3 − 6 1.5 to 6.0 k� at 20_C (68_F)

1 − 4 1.5 to 6.0 k� at 20_C (68_F)

NG Replace accelerator pedal position sensor.

OK

3 Check for open and short in harness and connector in VCPA, VCP2, VPA, VPA2
EPA and EPA2 circuit between engine control ECU and accelerator pedal posi-
tion sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the A17 accelerator pedal position sensor

connector.
(b) Disconnect the E11 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

VPA1 (A17−5) − VPA (E11−22) Below 1 �

EP1 (A17−3) − EPA (E11−28) Below 1 �

VCP1 (A17−6) − VCPA (E11−26) Below 1 �

VPA2 (A17−2) − VPA2 (E11−23) Below 1 �

EP2 (A17−1) − EPA2 (E11−29) Below 1 �

VCP2 (A17−4) − VCP2 (E11−27) Below 1 �

VPA1 (A17−5) or VPA (E11−22) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

EP1 (A17−3) or EPA (E11−28) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

VCP1 (A17−6) or VCPA (E11−26) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

VPA2 (A17−2) or VPA2 (E11−23) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher
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EP2 (A17−1) or EPA2 (E11−29) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

VCP2 (A17−4) or VCP2 (E11−27) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

4 Check voltage between terminals VCPA and EPA, and VCP2 and EPA2 of engine
control ECU terminals.

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(b) Disconnect the A17 accelerator pedal position sensor

connector.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between the specified terminals of the E11
engine control ECU connector.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

VCPA (E11−26) − EPA (E11−28) 4.5 to 5.5 V

VCP2 (E11−27) − EPA2 (E11−29) 4.5 to 5.5 V

NG Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630, page FI−74).

OK
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5 Check if DTC output recur?

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Disconnect the battery terminals or remove the EFI or ECD No. 1 fuse and ETCS fuse (Clear DTCs).
(c) Start the engine.
(d) Drive the engine at idle for 15 seconds or more.
CHECK:
Read the DTC output.
OK:

No DTC output.

OK System is OK.

NG

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E, page FI−74).


